Maine, session 132, LD1822.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 1057 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 1057
MAINE ONLINE DATA PRIVACY ACT
§9601. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Maine Data Privacy and Protection Act."
§9602. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Affiliate. "Affiliate" means a person that, directly or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another person,
such that the person:
A. Owns or has the power to vote more than 50% of the outstanding shares of any
voting class of the other person's securities;
B. Has the power to elect or influence the election of a majority of the directors,
members or managers of the other person;
C. Has the power to direct the management of the other person; or
D. Is subject to the other person's exercise of the powers described in paragraph A, B
or C.
2. Authenticate. "Authenticate" means to use reasonable means to determine that a
request to exercise a consumer right in accordance with section 9606 is being made by, or
on behalf of, a consumer who is entitled to exercise the consumer right with respect to the
personal data at issue.
3. Biometric data. "Biometric data":
A. Means data generated by automatic measurements of the biological characteristics
of a consumer that can be used to uniquely authenticate a consumer's identity, including
a fingerprint, a voiceprint, an image of a retina or iris and any other biological
characteristic that can be used to uniquely authenticate a consumer's identity; and
B. Does not include a digital or physical photograph, an audio or video recording or
any data generated from a digital or physical photograph or an audio or video recording,
unless the data is generated to identify a specific consumer.
4. Business associate. "Business associate" has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
5. Child. "Child" means an individual who has not attained 13 years of age.
6. Collect. "Collect" means to purchase, rent, gather, obtain, receive, access or
otherwise acquire personal data.
7. Consent. "Consent":
Page 1 - 132LR0014(01)

A. Means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer's freely given, specific,
informed and unambiguous agreement to allow the processing of personal data relating
to the consumer for a particular purpose. "Consent" may include a written statement,
including by electronic means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action; and
B. Does not include:
(1) Acceptance of a general or broad terms of use document or similar document
that contains descriptions of personal data processing along with other unrelated
information;
(2) Hovering over, muting, pausing or closing a piece of content; or
(3) Agreement obtained through the use of a dark pattern.
8. Consumer. "Consumer":
A. Means an individual who is a resident of this State; and
B. Does not include an individual acting in a commercial or employment context or an
individual acting as an employee, owner, director, officer or contractor of a company,
partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit organization or government entity whose
communications or transactions with a controller occur solely within the context of the
individual's role with the company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit
organization or government entity.
9. Consumer health data. "Consumer health data" means personal data that a
controller uses to identify a consumer's physical or mental health status, and includes, but
is not limited to, data related to gender-affirming health care services and reproductive
health care services.
10. Control. "Control" means:
A. Ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50% of the outstanding shares of
any class of voting security of a person;
B. Control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors of a person
or of individuals exercising similar functions in a business; or
C. Power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a person.
11. Controller. "Controller" means a person that, alone or jointly with other persons,
determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.
12. Covered entity. "Covered entity" has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
13. Dark pattern. "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the substantial effect of subverting user autonomy, decision making or choice and includes,
but is not limited to, any practice the Federal Trade Commission refers to as a "dark
pattern."
14. De-identified data. "De-identified data" means data that cannot reasonably be used
to infer information about or otherwise be linked to an identified or identifiable consumer,
or a device that may be linked to an identified or identifiable consumer, if the controller
that possesses the data:
A. Takes reasonable measures to ensure that the de-identified data cannot be linked
with a consumer;
Page 2 - 132LR0014(01)

B. Commits in a publicly available terms and conditions document or in a publicly
available privacy policy to maintain and use the data in its de-identified format; and
C. Contractually obligates recipients of the data to satisfy the criteria and commitments
in paragraphs A and B.
15. Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the
consumer. "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the
consumer" means decisions that result in the provision or denial to the consumer of
financial or lending services; housing; insurance; education enrollment or opportunity;
criminal justice; employment opportunities; health care services; or access to essential
goods or services.
16. Familial status. "Familial status" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section 4553,
subsection 5-A.
17. Gender identity. "Gender identity" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section
4553, subsection 5-C.
18. Gender-affirming health care services. "Gender-affirming health care services"
has the same meaning as in Title 14, section 9002, subsection 4.
19. Genetic data. "Genetic data" means any data, regardless of its format, that
concerns a consumer's genetic characteristics. "Genetic data" includes, but is not limited
to:
A. Raw sequence data that results from sequencing of a consumer's complete extracted
deoxyribonucleic acid, or DNA, or a portion of the consumer's DNA;
B. Information extrapolated, derived or inferred from analyzing the raw sequence data
under paragraph A, including, but not limited to, genotypic and phenotypic
information; and
C. Self-reported health information submitted to a direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company by a consumer regarding the consumer's health conditions that is used for
scientific research or product development and analyzed in connection with the
consumer's raw sequence data.
20. Geofence. "Geofence" means technology that establishes or monitors a virtual
geographic perimeter around a specific physical location through the use of global
positioning system coordinates, cellular tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency
identification, wireless access point data or any other form of location detection
technology.
21. HIPAA. "HIPAA" means the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 United States Code, Chapter 7, Subchapter XI, Part C, and
the regulations, rules, guidance and exemptions adopted pursuant to that Act.
22. Identified or identifiable consumer. "Identified or identifiable consumer" means
a consumer who can readily be identified, either directly or indirectly.
23. Institution of higher education. "Institution of higher education" means a person
that is licensed or accredited to offer one or more programs of postsecondary education
leading to one or more degrees.
Page 3 - 132LR0014(01)

24. Personal data. "Personal data" means information that is linked or can be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable consumer or that is linked or reasonably
can be linked to a device that is linked or reasonably can be linked to an identified or
identifiable consumer. "Personal data" does not include de-identified data or publicly
available information.
25. Physical or mental disability. "Physical or mental disability" has the same
meaning as in Title 5, section 4553, subsection 7-A.
26. Precise geolocation data. "Precise geolocation data":
A. Means information derived from technology that can precisely and accurately
identify the specific location of a Consumer within a radius of 1,750 feet. "Precise
geolocation data" includes global positioning system level latitude and longitude
coordinates or data from other similar mechanisms; and
B. Does not include the content of communications, data generated by or connected to
advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or data generated by equipment used
by a utility.
27. Process. "Process" means any operation or set of operations performed on personal
data or on sets of personal data by manual or automated means, including the use, storage,
disclosure, analysis, deletion or modification of personal data.
28. Processor. "Processor" means a person that processes personal data on behalf of
a controller.
29. Profiling. "Profiling" means any form of automated process performed on personal
data to evaluate, analyze or predict personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable
consumer's economic situation, health, demographic characteristics, personal preferences,
interests, reliability, behavior, location or movements.
30. Protected health information. "Protected health information" has the same
meaning as in HIPAA.
31. Publicly available information. "Publicly available information":
A. Means information about a consumer that a person:
(1) Lawfully obtains from a record of a governmental entity;
(2) Reasonably believes has been lawfully made available to the general public by
the consumer or by widely distributed media; or
(3) Obtains from a person to whom the consumer disclosed the information unless
the consumer has restricted the information to a specific audience; and
B. Does not include:
(1) Any obscene visual depiction as described in 18 United States Code, Section
1460;
(2) Biometric data;
(3) Genetic data, unless the genetic data has been made available to the general
public by the consumer;
Page 4 - 132LR0014(01)

(4) Inferences derived from a combination of publicly available information and
other personal data; or
(5) Intimate images a controller or processor knows have been created or shared
without consent of the consumer depicted in the images. For purposes of this
subparagraph, "intimate image" means a photograph, videotape, film or digital
recording of a consumer in a state of nudity or engaged in a sexual act or engaged
in sexual contact for which there is no public or newsworthy purpose.
32. Reproductive health care services. "Reproductive health care services" has the
same meaning as in Title 14, section 9002, subsection 9.
33. Sale of personal data. "Sale of personal data":
A. Means the exchange of personal data for monetary or other valuable consideration
by a controller, processor or affiliate of a controller or processor to a 3rd party; and
B. Does not include:
(1) The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data
on behalf of the controller if the processing of the personal data is limited to the
controller's processing purpose;
(2) The disclosure of personal data to a 3rd party for purposes of providing a
product or service affirmatively requested by the consumer;
(3) The disclosure of personal data to an affiliate of the controller;
(4) The disclosure of personal data when the consumer directs the controller to
disclose the personal data or intentionally uses the controller to interact with a 3rd
party;
(5) The disclosure of personal data that the consumer:
(a) Intentionally made available to the general public via mass media; and
(b) Did not restrict to a specific audience; or
(6) The disclosure of personal data to a 3rd party as an asset that is part of an actual
or proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction in which the 3rd
party assumes control of all or part of the controller's assets.
34. Sensitive data. "Sensitive data" means personal data that includes:
A. Data revealing racial or ethnic origins, religious beliefs, consumer health data,
sexual activity, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin or citizenship or
immigration status;
B. Genetic data or biometric data;
C. Personal data of a consumer that the controller knows or should know is a minor;
D. Precise geolocation data;
E. A social security number, driver's license number or nondriver identification card
number;
F. Billing, financial or payment method information, except that "sensitive data" does
not include the last 4 digits of a debit card or credit card number;
Page 5 - 132LR0014(01)

G. Account or device log-in credentials or security or access codes, including
passwords, for an account or device; or
H. Data concerning a consumer's status as a victim of a crime. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "victim" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2101, subsection 2.
35. Sex. "Sex" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section 4572-A, subsection 1.
36. Sexual orientation. "Sexual orientation" has the same meaning as in Title 5,
section 4553, subsection 9-C.
37. Targeted advertising. "Targeted advertising":
A. Means displaying advertisements to a consumer or on a device identified by a unique
identifier when the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained or
inferred from the consumer's activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or
online applications that are unaffiliated with each other in order to predict the
consumer's preferences or interests; and
B. Does not include:
(1) Advertisements based on the context of a consumer's current search query or
visit to a website or online application;
(2) Advertisements based on a consumer's activities within a controller's own
websites or online applications;
(3) Advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the consumer's request
for information or feedback; or
(4) Processing personal data solely to measure or report advertising frequency,
performance or reach.
38. Third party. "Third party" means a person other than the consumer, controller,
processor or affiliate of the controller or processor of particular personal data.
39. Trade secret. "Trade secret" has the same meaning as in section 1542, subsection
4.
§9603. Applicability
1. Effective date. The requirements of this chapter take effect on July 1, 2026.
2. Persons affected. The provisions of this chapter apply to persons that conduct
business in this State or persons that produce products or services that are targeted to
residents of this State and that during the preceding calendar year:
A. Controlled or processed the personal data of not less than 35,000 consumers,
excluding personal data controlled or processed solely for the purpose of completing a
payment transaction; or
B. Controlled or processed the personal data of not less than 10,000 consumers and
derived more than 20% of gross revenue from the sale of personal data.
§9604. Exceptions
1. Exempt entities. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
A. A body, authority, board, bureau, commission, district or agency of this State, a
political subdivision of this State or a federally recognized Indian tribe in this State;
Page 6 - 132LR0014(01)

B. An organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Section
501(c)(4), Section 501(c)(6) or Section 501(c)(12) of the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
C. An institution of higher education;
D. A national securities association that is registered under the federal Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, 15 United States Code, Section 78a et seq.;
E. A supervised financial organization or a service corporation. For purposes of this
paragraph, "supervised financial organization" has the same meaning as in Title 9-A,
section 1-301, subsection 38-A and "service corporation" has the same meaning as in
Title 9-B, section 131, subsection 37;
F. A health care facility, a health care practitioner or an affiliate of a health care facility
or health care practitioner that qualifies both as a business associate of that health care
facility or health care practitioner and provides services only to covered entities. For
purposes of this paragraph, "health care facility" and "health care practitioner" have the
same meaning as in Title 22, section 1711-C, subsection 1, paragraphs D and F,
respectively;
G. A person or entity that qualifies as a licensee under Title 24-A, section 2263,
subsection 8, to the extent the person or entity is in compliance with any applicable
data security and data privacy requirements of Title 24-A; or
H. A person or entity that is a provider of broadband Internet access service as defined
in Title 35-A, section 9301, but only to the extent that the person or entity is providing
broadband Internet access service.
2. Exempt data. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
A. Nonpublic personal information regulated under and collected, processed, sold or
disclosed in accordance with the requirements of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act,
15 United States Code, Section 6801 et seq. (1999);
B. Protected health information;
C. Patient-identifying information as described in 42 United States Code, Section
290dd-2;
D. Identifiable private information used for the purposes of the federal policy for the
protection of human subjects in research under 45 Code of Federal Regulations, Part
46;
E. Identifiable private information to the extent that it is collected as part of human
subjects in research pursuant to the good clinical practice guidelines issued by the
International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for
Pharmaceuticals for Human Use or successor organization or in accordance with the
standards for the protection of human subjects in research under 21 Code of Federal
Regulations, Parts 50 and 56;
F. Personal data used or shared in research, as defined in 45 Code of Federal
Regulations, Section 164.501, that is conducted in accordance with the standards set
forth in paragraphs D and E, or other research conducted in accordance with applicable
law;
Page 7 - 132LR0014(01)

G. Information and documents created for purposes of the federal Health Care Quality
Improvement Act of 1986, 42 United States Code, Section 11101 et seq.;
H. Information derived from health care-related information listed in this subsection
that is de-identified in accordance with the requirements for de-identification pursuant
to HIPAA;
I. Information that originates from information described in paragraphs B to H, or
information that is intermingled so as to be indistinguishable from information
described in paragraphs B to H, that a covered entity, business associate or program or
activity relating to substance use disorder as described in 42 United States Code,
Section 290dd-2, creates, processes or maintains in the same manner as is required
under the applicable laws and regulations cited in paragraphs B to H;
J. Information used for public health activities and purposes as authorized by HIPAA;
K. The collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication or use of personal
information bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity,
character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living by a consumer
reporting agency, furnisher or user that provides information for use in a consumer
report, and by a user of a consumer report, but only to the extent that such activity is
regulated by and authorized under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 United
States Code, Section 1681 et seq.;
L. Personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in compliance with the federal
Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 United States Code, Section 2721 et seq.;
M. Personal data regulated by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act
of 1974, 20 United States Code, Section 1232g et seq.;
N. Personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in compliance with the federal
Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12 United States Code, Section 2001 et seq.;
O. Data processed or maintained:
(1) In the course of an individual's applying to, being employed by or acting as an
agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor or 3rd party, to the extent
that the data is collected and used within the context of that role;
(2) As the emergency contact information of an individual under this chapter used
for emergency contact purposes; or
(3) That is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual relating
to the individual who is the subject of the information under subparagraph (1) and
used for the purposes of administering those benefits; or
P. Personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in relation to price, route or
service, as such terms are used in the federal Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, 49
United States Code, Section 40101 et seq., by an air carrier subject to that Act, to the
extent this chapter is preempted by the federal Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, 49
United States Code, Section 41713.
3. Compliance with COPPA. Controllers and processors that comply with the
verifiable parental consent requirements of the federal Children's Online Privacy Protection
Act of 1998, 15 United States Code, Section 6501 et seq., and the regulations, rules,
Page 8 - 132LR0014(01)

413 guidance and exemptions adopted pursuant to that Act are compliant with an obligation to
424 obtain parental consent pursuant to this chapter.
§9605. Consumer health data
1. Confidentiality. A person may not provide an employee or a contractor access to
consumer health data unless:
A. The employee or contractor is subject to a contractual or statutory duty of
confidentiality; or
B. Confidentiality is required as a condition of employment of the employee.
2. Processor duties. A person may not provide a processor access to consumer health
data unless the person providing access to the consumer health data and the processor
comply with section 9609.
3. Geofence. A person may not use a geofence to establish a virtual perimeter that is
within 1,750 feet of any facility that provides in-person health care services for the purpose
of identifying, tracking or collecting data from or for the purpose of sending any
notification to a consumer regarding the consumer's health data. This subsection does not
prohibit the operator of a facility that provides in-person health care services from using a
geofence around the facility.
§9606. Consumer rights
1. Consumer rights. A consumer has the right to:
A. Confirm whether a controller is processing the consumer's personal data;
B. If a controller processes a consumer's personal data, access the consumer's personal
data;
C. Correct inaccuracies in the consumer's personal data, taking into account the nature
of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the consumer's personal data;
D. Require a controller to delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the
consumer unless retention of the personal data is required by law;
E. When processing of personal data is done by automatic means, obtain a copy of the
consumer's personal data processed by the controller in a portable and, to the extent
technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the consumer to transmit the data
to another controller easily and without hindrance;
F. Obtain a list of the 3rd parties to which the controller has sold the consumer's
personal data or, if the controller does not maintain information about the 3rd parties
to which the controller has sold the personal data of the specific consumer, obtain a list
of the 3rd parties to which the controller has sold any consumer's personal data; and
G. Opt out of the processing of the consumer's personal data for purposes of:
(1) Targeted advertising;
(2) The sale of personal data; or
(3) Profiling in furtherance of solely automated decisions that produce legal or
similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.
Page 9 - 132LR0014(01)

2. Exception; trade secrets. This section may not be construed to require a controller
to reveal a trade secret.
3. Exercise of consumer rights. This subsection governs exercise of the consumer
rights established in subsection 1.
A. A controller shall establish a secure and reliable method for a consumer to exercise
a consumer right under this section.
B. A consumer may exercise a consumer right under this section using the method
established by the controller under paragraph A.
4. Exercise of consumer rights by agent or guardian. The following persons may
exercise the rights established in subsection 1 on behalf of a consumer.
A. A consumer may designate an agent in accordance with section 9607 to exercise the
consumer's right under subsection 1, paragraph G to opt out of the processing of
personal data.
B. If the consumer is a child, a parent or legal guardian may exercise the consumer's
rights under subsection 1.
C. If the consumer is subject to a guardianship, conservatorship or other protective
arrangement, the guardian or conservator of the consumer may exercise the consumer's
rights under subsection 1.
5. Response to exercise of consumer rights. Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, a controller shall comply with a request by a consumer or other person authorized
to exercise the consumer's rights under subsection 1 as follows.
A. A controller shall respond to a request not later than 45 days after the controller
receives the request. The controller may extend the response period by a period of 45
days if:
(1) It is reasonably necessary to extend the period to complete the request based on
the complexity and number of the requests; and
(2) The controller informs the consumer of the extension and the reason for the
extension within the initial 45-day response period.
B. If a controller declines to take action regarding the request, the controller shall
inform the consumer without undue delay, but not later than the 45th day after receipt
of the request, of:
(1) The justification for declining to take action; and
(2) Instructions for how to appeal the decision.
C. A controller shall provide information to a consumer in response to a request, free
of charge, once during any 12-month period, except that, if requests from a consumer
or other person authorized to exercise the consumer's rights are manifestly unfounded,
excessive, technically infeasible or repetitive, the controller may:
(1) Charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of
complying with the request; or
(2) Decline to act on the request.
Page 10 - 132LR0014(01)

The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded, excessive,
technically infeasible or repetitive nature of the request.
D. If a controller is unable to authenticate a request to exercise a consumer right under
subsection 1 using commercially reasonable efforts, the controller:
(1) Is not required to comply with a request to initiate an action in accordance with
this section; and
(2) Shall provide notice to the consumer that the controller is unable to authenticate
the request to exercise the right until the consumer or other person authorized to
exercise the consumer's rights provides additional information reasonably
necessary to authenticate the consumer and the consumer's request to exercise the
right.
E. Notwithstanding paragraph D and except as provided in section 9607, a controller
is not required to authenticate an opt-out request.
F. A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a source other
than the consumer is in compliance with a request to delete that data pursuant to
subsection 1, paragraph D by retaining a record of the deletion request and the
minimum data necessary for the purpose of ensuring that the consumer's personal data:
(1) Remains deleted from the controller's records; and
(2) Is not used for any other purpose.
6. Appeals. A controller shall establish a process in accordance with the requirements
of this subsection for a consumer or other person authorized to exercise the consumer's
rights to appeal the controller's inaction on a request within a reasonable period of time
after the consumer's receipt of the decision.
A. The appeal process must be conspicuously available and similar to the process for
submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to this section.
B. Not later than the 60th day after receipt of an appeal, a controller shall inform the
consumer or other person authorized to exercise the consumer's rights in writing of
action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of
the reasons for the decisions.
C. If a controller denies an appeal, the controller shall provide the consumer with an
online mechanism, if available, through which the consumer or other person authorized
to exercise the consumer's rights may contact the Attorney General to submit a
complaint.
§9607. Authorized agent
1. Authority to designate agent to opt out of processing. A consumer may designate
another person to serve as the consumer's authorized agent, and act on the consumer's
behalf, to exercise the consumer's right under section 9606, subsection 1, paragraph G to
opt out of the processing of personal data.
2. Method of designating agent. The consumer may designate an authorized agent
by way of, among other methods, a technology, including, but not limited to, an Internet
link or a browser setting, browser extension or global device setting, indicating the
consumer's intent to opt out of certain processing of the consumer's data.
Page 11 - 132LR0014(01)

3. Authentication of agent's opt-out request. A controller shall comply with a
request received from an authorized agent to exercise the consumer's right under section
9606, subsection 1, paragraph G to opt out of the processing of personal data if, using
commercially reasonable efforts, the controller is able to authenticate:
A. The identity of the consumer; and
B. The authorized agent's authority to act on the consumer's behalf.
§9608. Actions of controllers
1. Prohibitions. A controller may not:
A. Collect, process or share sensitive data concerning a consumer, unless the collection
or processing is strictly necessary to provide or maintain a specific product or service
requested by the consumer;
B. Sell sensitive data;
C. Process personal data in violation of state or federal laws that prohibit unlawful
discrimination;
D. If the controller knows or reasonably should know that the consumer is a minor:
(1) Process personal data of the consumer for the purpose of targeted advertising;
or
(2) Sell the personal data of the consumer;
E. Retaliate against a consumer for exercising a consumer right granted in this chapter,
including by denying goods or services, charging different prices or rates for goods or
services or providing a different level of quality of goods or services to the consumer;
F. Collect, process or disclose personal data or publicly available information in a
manner that unlawfully discriminates in or otherwise unlawfully makes unavailable the
equal enjoyment of goods or services on the basis of an individual's actual or perceived
race, color, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity, physical or mental disability,
religion, ancestry, national origin, age or familial status. This paragraph does not apply
to the collection, processing or disclosure of personal data for:
(1) The purpose of self-testing to prevent or mitigate unlawful discrimination;
(2) The purpose of diversifying an applicant, participant or customer pool; or
(3) A private establishment described in 42 United States Code, Section 2000a(e);
or
G. Unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent, process personal data for a
purpose that is neither reasonably necessary to nor compatible with the disclosed
purposes for which the personal data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer.
2. Duties. A controller shall:
A. Limit the collection of personal data to what is reasonably necessary and
proportionate to provide or maintain a specific product or service requested by the
consumer to whom the data pertains;
B. Establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative, technical and physical
data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of
Page 12 - 132LR0014(01)

411 personal data appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue. These
422 processes must include the disposal of personal data in accordance with a retention
433 schedule that requires the disposal of personal data by the controller when the data is
444 required to be deleted by law or when the data is no longer necessary for the purpose
455 for which the data was processed unless the consumer has consented to the retention
466 of the data for a longer period of time or retention of the data is required by law. For
477 purposes of this paragraph, "disposal of personal data" means the destruction or
488 permanent deletion of the data or other modification of the data to make the data
499 unreadable and unrecoverable; and
C. Provide an effective mechanism for a consumer to revoke the consumer's consent to
processing personal data under this section that is at least as easy to use as the
mechanism by which the consumer provided the consumer's consent and, upon
revocation of the consent, shall cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not
later than 30 days after the receipt of the request.
3. Exceptions; loyalty programs. Subsection 1 and 2 may not be construed to:
A. Require a controller to provide a product or service that requires the processing of
personal data of a consumer that the controller does not collect or maintain; or
B. Prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level, quality or selection
of goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for no fee, if
the offering is in connection with a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide
loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts or club card program, as long as the sale
of personal data is not a condition of participation in the program.
4. Privacy notice. A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible,
clear and meaningful privacy notice that includes the following information:
A. The categories of personal data, including sensitive data, processed by the
controller;
B. The controller's purpose for processing personal data;
C. How consumers may exercise their consumer rights under this chapter, including
how a consumer may appeal a controller's decision regarding the consumer's request
and how a consumer may revoke consent;
D. The categories of 3rd parties with which the controller shares personal data, with a
level of detail that enables a consumer to understand the type of, business model of or
processing conducted by each category of 3rd party;
E. The categories of personal data, including sensitive data, the controller shares with
any 3rd party;
F. The length of time the controller intends to retain each category of personal data or,
if it is not possible to identify the length of time, the criteria used to determine the
length of time the controller intends to retain each category of personal data; and
G. An active e-mail address or other online mechanism that a consumer may use to
contact the controller.
5. Notice of sale of personal data, targeted advertising or profiling; opt-out
mechanism. If a controller sells personal data to 3rd parties, processes personal data for
Page 13 - 132LR0014(01)

413 the purposes of targeted advertising or processes personal data for the purposes of profiling
424 the consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects
435 concerning the consumer, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the sale
446 or processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt out
457 of the sale or processing. The disclosure required under this subsection must be
468 prominently displayed on the controller's publicly accessible website and the language used
479 must be clear, easy to understand and unambiguous.
6. Method for exercising consumer rights. A controller shall establish, and shall
describe in the privacy notice as required by subsection 4, paragraph C, one or more secure
and reliable mechanisms for a consumer to submit a request to exercise each consumer
right under this chapter.
A. The design of the secure and reliable mechanism for a consumer to submit a request
must take into account:
(1) The ways in which consumers normally interact with the controller;
(2) The need for secure and reliable communication of consumer requests; and
(3) The ability of the controller to verify the identity of a consumer making the
request.
B. A controller may not require a consumer to create a new account to exercise a
consumer right. A controller may require a consumer to use an existing account to
exercise a consumer right.
C. A controller may satisfy the controller's obligation under this subsection to establish
a secure and reliable mechanism for a consumer to exercise the right to opt out under
subsection 5 by:
(1) Providing a clear and conspicuous link on the controller's publicly accessible
website to a webpage that allows a consumer, an authorized agent of the consumer
or a person authorized by section 9606, subsection 4 to exercise the consumer's
rights, to opt out of any processing of the consumer's personal data for the purposes
of targeted advertising or profiling or any sale of personal data; or
(2) No later than July 1, 2026, allowing a consumer to opt out of any processing of
the consumer's personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising or profiling
or any sale of personal data through an opt-out preference signal sent, with the
consumer's consent, by a platform, technology or mechanism to the controller
indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the processing or sale. The platform,
technology or mechanism:
(a) Must be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the average consumer;
(b) Must use clear, easy to understand and unambiguous language;
(c) Must be as consistent as possible with any other similar platform,
technology or mechanism required by federal or state law, rule or regulation;
(d) Must enable the controller to reasonably determine whether the consumer
is a resident of the State, which reasonable determination may be based on the
location associated with the consumer's Internet protocol address, and whether
Page 14 - 132LR0014(01)

412 the consumer has made a legitimate request to opt out of any such processing
423 or sale of the consumer's personal data;
(e) May not unfairly disadvantage another controller; and
(f) May not make use of a default setting but must require the consumer to
make an affirmative, freely given and unambiguous choice to opt out of any
such processing or sale of the consumer's personal data.
A controller that recognizes an opt-out preference signal that has been approved by the
laws of another state is considered to be in compliance with this paragraph.
D. If a consumer's decision to opt out of any processing of the consumer's personal data
for the purposes of targeted advertising or profiling or any sale of personal data through
an opt-out preference signal sent in accordance with paragraph C, subparagraph (2)
conflicts with the consumer's existing controller-specific privacy setting or the
consumer's voluntary participation in a controller's bona fide loyalty, rewards,
premium features, discounts or club card program, the controller may notify the
consumer of the conflict and provide the consumer a choice to confirm the controller-
specific privacy setting or participation that program.
§9609. Responsibilities of processors and controllers
1. Contract required. If a controller uses a processor to process personal data of a
consumer, the controller and the processor shall enter into a contract in accordance with
the requirements of this section that governs the processor's data processing procedures
with respect to processing performed on behalf of the controller.
A. The contract must be binding and must clearly set forth:
(1) Instructions for processing personal data;
(2) The nature and purpose of the processing;
(3) The type of personal data subject to processing;
(4) The duration of the processing; and
(5) The rights and obligations of the processor and the controller.
B. The contract must require that the processor:
(1) Ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty of
confidentiality with respect to the data;
(2) Establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative, technical and
physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and
accessibility of personal data, considering the volume and nature of the personal
data;
(3) Stop processing personal data on request by the controller made in accordance
with a consumer's authenticated request;
(4) At the controller's direction, delete or return all personal data to the controller
as requested at the end of the provision of service, unless retention of the personal
data is required by law;
Page 15 - 132LR0014(01)

(5) On the reasonable request of the controller, make available to the controller all
information in the processor's possession necessary to demonstrate the processor's
compliance with the obligations in this chapter;
(6) After providing the controller an opportunity to object, engage a subcontractor
to assist with processing personal data on the controller's behalf only in accordance
with a written contract that requires the subcontractor to meet the processor's
obligations regarding the personal data under the processor's contract with the
controller;
(7) Allow and cooperate with reasonable assessments by the controller, the
controller's designated assessor or a qualified and independent assessor arranged
for by the processor to assess the processor's policies and technical and
organizational measures in support of the obligations under this chapter. An
assessment conducted under this subparagraph must be conducted using an
appropriate and accepted control standard framework and assessment procedure;
and
(8) On request of the controller, provide the controller with a report of an
assessment conducted under subparagraph (7).
2. Processor responsibilities. A processor shall:
A. Adhere to a contract with a controller and the instructions of the controller;
B. Assist the controller in meeting the controller's obligations under this chapter,
including:
(1) By employing appropriate technical and organizational measures as much as
reasonably practicable to fulfill the controller's obligation to respond to requests to
exercise consumer rights, considering the nature of processing and the information
available to the processor; and
(2) By assisting the controller in meeting the controller's obligations in relation to
the security of processing the personal data under this chapter and in relation to the
notification of a breach of the security of a system, as required by chapter 210-B;
and
C. Provide necessary information to enable the controller to conduct and document
data protection assessments as required by section 9611.
3. Processing relationship liability. This section may not be construed to relieve a
controller or a processor from the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue
of the controller's or processor's role in the processing relationship in accordance with this
section.
4. Fact-based determination of role. The determination of whether a person is acting
as a controller or a processor with respect to a specific processing of personal data is a fact-
based determination that depends on the context in which the personal data is being
processed as described in this subsection.
A. A person is considered to be a controller if:
(1) The person is not limited in the person's processing of specific personal data in
accordance with a controller's instructions; or
Page 16 - 132LR0014(01)

(2) The person fails to adhere to a controller's instructions with respect to a specific
processing of personal data.
B. A processor that continues to adhere to a controller's instructions with respect to a
specific processing of personal data remains a processor.
C. If a processor or 3rd party begins, alone or jointly with others, determining the
purposes and means of the processing of personal data, the processor is a controller
with respect to the processing and may be subject to an enforcement action under
section 9614.
5. Controller's duties unaffected. This section may not be construed to alter a
controller's obligation to limit a person's processing of personal data or to take steps to
ensure that a processor adheres to the controller's instructions.
§9610. Third-party responsibilities
1. Notice required. If a 3rd party intends to use or share a consumer's personal data
in a manner inconsistent with the disclosures made to the consumer at the time that the
personal data was collected, the 3rd party shall provide an affected consumer with notice
of the new or changed use or sharing of personal data before implementing the new or
changed use or sharing.
2. Method of notification. The 3rd party shall provide the notice required by
subsection 1 in a manner and at a time reasonably calculated to allow a consumer to
exercise the consumer's rights under this chapter.
§9611. Data protection assessments
1. Definition. For the purposes of this section, "processing activities that present a
heightened risk of harm to a consumer" means:
A. The processing of personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising;
B. The sale of personal data;
C. The processing of sensitive data; and
D. The processing of personal data for the purposes of profiling, in which the profiling
presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:
(1) Unfair, abusive or deceptive treatment of a consumer;
(2) Having an unlawful disparate impact on a consumer;
(3) Financial, physical or reputational injury to a consumer;
(4) A physical or other intrusion on the solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs
or concerns, of a consumer, when the intrusion would be offensive to a reasonable
person; or
(5) Other substantial injury to a consumer.
2. Data protection assessments required. A controller shall conduct and document a
data protection assessment for each of the controller's processing activities that present a
heightened risk of harm to a consumer, including an assessment for each algorithm that is
used. A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of processing
operations that include similar activities.
Page 17 - 132LR0014(01)

3. Required elements. A data protection assessment required by subsection 2 must be
conducted in accordance with the requirements of this subsection.
A. The data protection assessment must identify and weigh the benefits that may flow
directly and indirectly from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other
interested parties and the public against:
(1) The potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with the processing
as mitigated by safeguards that may be employed by the controller to reduce these
risks; and
(2) The necessity and proportionality of processing in relation to the stated purpose
of the processing.
B. The controller shall factor into a data protection assessment:
(1) The use of de-identified data;
(2) The reasonable expectations of consumers;
(3) The context of the processing; and
(4) The relationship between the controller and the consumer whose personal data
will be processed.
4. Disclosure to Attorney General. The Attorney General may require that a
controller disclose to the Attorney General a data protection assessment that is relevant to
an investigation conducted by the Attorney General. The Attorney General may evaluate
the data protection assessment for compliance with the responsibilities set forth in this
chapter.
5. Confidentiality. A data protection assessment is confidential and exempt from
disclosure under Title 1, chapter 13 but may be used by the Attorney General in an action
to enforce this chapter. To the extent that any information contained in a data protection
assessment disclosed to the Attorney General pursuant to this section includes information
subject to attorney-client privilege or work product protection, the disclosure does not
constitute a waiver of that privilege or protection.
6. Reciprocity. If a controller conducts a data protection assessment for the purpose
of complying with another applicable law or regulation, the data protection assessment
satisfies the requirements established in this section if the data protection assessment is
reasonably similar in scope and effect to the data protection assessment that would
otherwise be conducted in accordance with this section.
7. Deadlines for performing data protection assessments. A controller shall conduct
and document a data protection assessment as required by this section:
A. Within 6 months of the date that the controller first engages in a processing activity
that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer; and
B. Within 6 months of making a material change to any processing activity that presents
a heightened risk of harm to a consumer.
8. Application. The requirement to conduct a data protection assessment under this
section applies only to processing activities that occur on or after July 1, 2026.
§9612. De-identified data
Page 18 - 132LR0014(01)

1. Re-identification not required. This chapter may not be construed to require a
controller or processor to:
A. Re-identify de-identified data;
B. Maintain data in an identifiable form; or
C. Collect, obtain, retain or access any data or technology in order to be capable of
associating an authenticated consumer request with personal data.
2. Consumer requests. This chapter may not be construed to require a controller or
processor to comply with an authenticated consumer rights request if the controller:
A. Is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the personal data, or it
would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate the request with the
personal data;
B. Does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the consumer who is the
subject of the personal data, or associate the personal data with other personal data
about the same consumer; and
C. Does not sell the personal data to a 3rd party or otherwise voluntarily disclose the
personal data to a 3rd party other than a processor, except as otherwise allowed in this
chapter.
3. Contractual oversight. A controller that discloses de-identified data shall exercise
reasonable oversight to monitor compliance with contractual commitments to which the
de-identified data is subject and shall take appropriate steps to address breaches of those
contractual commitments. Whether oversight is reasonable and whether steps taken to
address breaches of contractual commitments are appropriate depends in part on whether
the disclosed de-identified data would be considered sensitive data if the data were re-
identified.
§9613. Exemptions
1. Exempt activities. This chapter may not be construed to restrict a controller's or
processor's ability to:
A. Comply with federal laws or regulations, the laws and rules of the State or local
laws and ordinances;
B. Comply with a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
summons by a federal or Maine governmental authority, including a governmental
authority of a federally recognized Indian tribe in the State;
C. Cooperate with federal, tribal or Maine law enforcement agencies concerning
conduct or activity that the controller or processor reasonably and in good faith believes
may violate federal laws or regulations, the laws and rules of the State or local laws
and ordinances;
D. Investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for or defend legal claims;
E. Provide a product or service specifically requested by a consumer;
F. Perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including fulfilling the
terms of a written warranty;
G. Take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a contract;
Page 19 - 132LR0014(01)

H. Take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life or physical
safety of the consumer or another individual and when the processing cannot be
manifestly based on another legal basis;
I. Prevent, detect, protect against, investigate, prosecute those responsible for or
respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive
activities or any other type of illegal activity;
J. Preserve the integrity or security of systems; or
K. Assist another controller or processor or a 3rd party with an obligation under this
chapter.
2. Internal use. The obligations imposed on a controller or processor under this chapter
do not restrict a controller's or processor's ability to collect, use or retain personal data for
internal use to:
A. Effectuate a product recall;
B. Identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended functionality; or
C. Perform internal operations that:
(1) Are reasonably aligned with the expectations of the consumer or can be
reasonably anticipated based on the consumer's existing relationship with the
controller; or
(2) Are otherwise compatible with processing data to provide a product or service
specifically requested by a consumer or performing under a contract to which the
consumer is a party.
3. Evidentiary privilege. The obligations imposed on controllers or processors under
this chapter do not apply when compliance with this chapter by the controller or processor
would violate an evidentiary privilege under state law. This chapter may not be construed
to prevent a controller or processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer
to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under state law as part of a privileged
communication.
4. Exceptions to liability. This subsection limits the liability of a controller, processor
or 3rd-party controller for violations of this chapter by other persons.
A. A controller or processor that discloses personal data to a processor or a 3rd-party
controller in compliance with this chapter has not violated this chapter if the processor
or 3rd-party controller that receives the personal data violates this chapter as long as:
(1) At the time the disclosing controller or processor disclosed the personal data,
the disclosing controller or processor did not have actual knowledge that the
receiving processor or 3rd-party controller would violate this chapter; and
(2) At the time the disclosing controller or processor disclosed the personal data,
the disclosing controller or processor was, and remained, in compliance with its
obligations as the discloser of the personal data.
B. A 3rd-party controller or processor that receives personal data from a controller or
processor in compliance with this chapter is not in violation of this chapter for the
independent misconduct of the controller or processor from which the 3rd-party
controller or processor received the personal data.
Page 20 - 132LR0014(01)

5. Freedom of speech; freedom of the press; personal or household use. This
chapter may not be construed to:
A. Impose an obligation on a controller or processor that adversely affects the rights
or freedoms of any person, including, but not limited to, the rights of any person to
freedom of speech or freedom to engage in political activity or the right of freedom of
the press guaranteed in the United States Constitution, Amendment I; or
B. Apply to an individual's processing of personal data in the course of the individual's
purely personal or household activities.
6. Burden of proof. If a controller processes personal data pursuant to an exemption
in this section, the controller bears the burden of demonstrating that the processing qualifies
for the exemption and complies with the limitations in subsection 7.
7. Limitations. Personal data processed by a controller or processor pursuant to an
exemption in this section may be processed only to the extent that the processing is:
A. Subject to reasonable administrative, technical and physical measures to protect the
confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of the personal data and reduce reasonably
foreseeable risks of harm to consumers relating to the collection, use or retention of
personal data;
B. Reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in this section; and
C. Adequate, relevant and limited to what is necessary in relation to the specific
purposes listed in this section.
8. Processing personal data pursuant to an exemption. A person that processes
personal data pursuant to an exemption in this section may not be considered a controller
solely based on that processing of personal data.
§9614. Enforcement
1. Violation as unfair trade practice; exclusive Attorney General enforcement. A
violation of this chapter constitutes an unfair trade practice under the Maine Unfair Trade
Practices Act, except that the provisions of Title 5, section 213 do not apply to this chapter
and except as provided in subsection 2. The Attorney General has the exclusive authority
to enforce violations of this chapter under the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act.
2. Discretionary notice and right to cure. Notwithstanding any provision of the
Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act to the contrary, before initiating any action under
subsection 1 for an alleged violation that occurs on or before April 1, 2027, if the Attorney
General believes that it is possible to cure the alleged violation, the Attorney General may
issue a notice of violation to the controller or processor that is allegedly violating this
chapter. If the Attorney General issues a notice of violation to a controller or processor
under this subsection, the Attorney General may not bring an action to enforce the violation
unless the controller or processor fails to cure the violation within 60 days of receiving the
notice of violation. The Attorney General shall consider the following factors in deciding
whether to issue a notice of violation under this subsection:
A. The number of alleged violations;
B. The size and complexity of the controller or processor;
C. The nature and extent of the controller's or processor's processing activities;
Page 21 - 132LR0014(01)

D. The likelihood of injury to the public;
E. The degree to which the alleged violations affect the safety of persons and property;
F. Whether the alleged violation was likely caused by a human or technical error; and
G. The extent to which the controller or processor has previously violated this chapter
or similar laws.
Sec. 2. Report. By February 1, 2027, the Attorney General shall submit a report to
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters
regarding the implementation and operation of the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10,
chapter 1057. The report must include, at a minimum, the following information:
1. The number of notices the Attorney General has issued under Title 10, section 9614,
subsection 2 and the nature of the violations alleged in the notices;
2. The number of persons sent a notice described in subsection 1 that conferred with
the Attorney General during the notice period described in Title 10, section 9614,
subsection 2 in a manner that alleviated the need for a civil action under the Maine Unfair
Trade Practices Act;
3. The number of civil actions brought by the Attorney General under the Maine Unfair
Trade Practices Act to enforce violations of Title 10, chapter 1057; and
4. Any recommendations the Attorney General has for improving the operation of Title
10, chapter 1057.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary
matters may report out legislation related to the report to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.